Tennessee, session 114, HB2184.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 20-18-105(a), is amended by
deleting "fifteen (15) calendar" and substituting "ninety (90) calendar".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2184
010563
- 1 -